Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-313.6] Original equipment
manufacturer's and like kind and quality parts. (a) An insurer shall make
available a choice to the insured of authorizing a repair provider to utilize a
like kind and quality part of an equal or better quality than the original
equipment manufacturer part if such part is available or an original equipment
manufacturer part for motor vehicle body repair work. If the insured or
claimant chooses the use of an original equipment manufacturer part, the
insured or claimant shall pay the additional cost of the original equipment
manufacturer part that is in excess of the equivalent like kind and quality
part, unless original equipment parts are required by the vehicle
manufacturer's warranty.

(b) A like kind and quality part under
subsection (a), of an equal or better quality than the original equipment
manufacturer part, shall carry a guarantee in writing for the quality of the
like kind and quality part for not less than ninety days or for the same
guarantee period as the original equipment manufacturer part, whichever is
longer. The guarantee shall be provided by the insurer.

(c) Like kind and quality parts, certified or
approved by governmental or industry organizations, shall be utilized if
available. [L 1997, c 251, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next